Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1180.
do enact as follows:SB1180,11Section 1. 8.04 of the statutes is amended to read:SB1180,2,728.04 Nomination paper signatures. If any A person signs may sign 3nomination papers for 2 or more candidates for the same office in the same election 4at different times, the earlier signature is valid and the later signature is invalid. If 5any. A person circulates a nomination paper may circulate nomination papers for 2 6or more candidates for the same office in the same election at different times, the 7earlier paper is valid and the later paper is invalid.SB1180,28Section 2. 8.10 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1180,2,1498.10 (1) Candidates for office to be filled at the spring election shall be 10nominated by nomination papers, or by nomination papers and selection at the 11primary if a primary is held, except as provided for towns and villages under s. 8.05. 12Unless designated in this section or s. 8.05, the general provisions pertaining to 13nomination at the partisan primary apply, including the certification requirements 14under s. 8.15 (4) (a) and (am).SB1180,315Section 3. 8.10 (2) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1180,2,17168.10 (2) (b) Each nomination paper shall have substantially the following 17words printed at the top:SB1180,3,818I, the undersigned, request that the name of (insert candidate’s last name plus 1first name, nickname or initial, and middle name, former legal surname, nickname 2or middle initial or initials if desired, but no other abbreviations or titles), residing 3at (insert candidate’s street address) be placed on the ballot at the (spring or 4special) election to be held on (date of election) as a candidate so that voters will 5have the opportunity to vote for (him or her) for the office of (name of office). I am 6eligible to vote in the (name of jurisdiction or district in which candidate seeks 7office). I have not signed the nomination paper of any other candidate for the same 8office at this election.SB1180,49Section 4. 8.10 (4) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1180,3,15108.10 (4) (b) Only one signature per person for the same office candidate is 11valid. In addition to his or her signature, in order for the signature to be valid, each 12signer of a nomination paper shall legibly print his or her name in a space provided 13next to his or her signature and shall list his or her municipality of residence for 14voting purposes, the street and number, if any, on which the signer resides, and the 15date of signing.SB1180,516Section 5. 8.15 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1180,3,22178.15 (2) Only one signature per person for the same office candidate is valid. 18In addition to his or her signature, in order for the signature to be valid, each signer 19of a nomination paper shall legibly print his or her name in a space provided next to 20his or her signature and shall list his or her municipality of residence for voting 21purposes, the street and number, if any, on which the signer resides, and the date of 22signing.SB1180,61Section 6. 8.15 (4) (a) of the statutes is renumbered 8.15 (4) (a) (intro.) and 2amended to read:SB1180,4,538.15 (4) (a) (intro.) The certification of a qualified circulator stating his or her 4residence with street and number, if any, shall appear at the bottom of each 5nomination paper, stating he or she and shall state all of the following:SB1180,4,762. That the circulator personally circulated the nomination paper and 7personally obtained each of the signatures; he or she knows they.SB1180,4,1083. That, to the best of the circulator’s knowledge, the signers are electors of 9the ward, aldermanic district, municipality, or county, as the nomination papers 10require; he or she knows they.SB1180,4,12114. That the circulator knows the signers signed the paper with full knowledge 12of its content; he or she knows their respective.SB1180,4,14135. That, to the best of the circulator’s knowledge, the residences given; he or 14she by the signers are actual residences.SB1180,4,16156. That the circulator knows each signer signed on the date stated opposite his 16or her name; and, that he or she,.SB1180,4,20177. That the circulator, is a qualified elector of this state, or if not a qualified 18elector of this state, is a U.S. citizen age 18 or older who, if he or she were a resident 19of this state, would not be disqualified from voting under s. 6.03; that he or she 20intends to support the candidate; and that he or she.SB1180,4,22218. That the circulator is aware that falsifying the certification is punishable 22under s. 12.13 (3) (a).SB1180,5,223(am) The circulator certification under par. (a) shall indicate the date that he 1or she the circulator makes the certification next to his or her signature. The 2certification may be made by the candidate or any qualified circulator.SB1180,73Section 7. 8.15 (4) (a) 1. of the statutes is created to read:SB1180,5,448.15 (4) (a) 1. The circulator’s residence with street and number, if any.SB1180,85Section 8. 8.15 (5) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1180,5,768.15 (5) (a) Each nomination paper shall have substantially the following 7words printed at the top:SB1180,5,168I, the undersigned, request that the name of (insert candidate’s last name plus 9first name, nickname or initial, and middle name, former legal surname, nickname 10or middle initial or initials if desired, but no other abbreviations or titles) residing 11at (insert candidate’s street address) be placed on the ballot at the (general or 12special) election to be held on (date of election) as a candidate representing the 13(name of party) so that voters will have the opportunity to vote for (him or her) for 14the office of (name of office). I am eligible to vote in (name of jurisdiction or district 15in which candidate seeks office). I have not signed the nomination paper of any 16other candidate for the same office at this election.SB1180,917Section 9. 8.20 (2) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1180,5,19188.20 (2) (a) Nomination is by nomination papers. Each nomination paper 19shall have substantially the following words printed at the top:SB1180,6,620I, the undersigned, request that the name of (insert candidate’s last name plus 21first name, nickname or initial, and middle name, former legal surname, nickname 22or middle initial or initials if desired, but no other abbreviations or titles), residing 23at (insert candidate’s street address) be placed on the ballot at the (general or 1special) election to be held on (date of election) as a candidate [(representing the 2(name of party)) or (representing the principle(s) of (statement of principles))] so 3that voters will have the opportunity to vote for (him or her) for the office of (name 4of office). I am eligible to vote in the (name of jurisdiction or district in which 5candidate seeks office). I have not signed the nomination paper of any other 6candidate for the same office at this election.SB1180,107Section 10. 8.20 (5) of the statutes is amended to read:SB1180,6,1488.20 (5) Only one signature per person for the same office candidate is valid. 9In addition to his or her signature, in order for the signature to be valid, each signer 10shall legibly print his or her name in a space provided next to his or her signature 11and shall list his or her municipality of residence for voting purposes, the street and 12number, if any, on which the signer resides, and the date of signing. Signers of each 13nomination paper shall reside in the same jurisdiction or district which the 14candidate named therein will represent, if elected.SB1180,1115Section 11. 8.40 (2) of the statutes is renumbered 8.40 (2) (a) (intro.) and 16amended to read:SB1180,6,20178.40 (2) (a) (intro.) The certification of a qualified circulator stating his or her 18residence with street and number, if any, shall appear at the bottom of each 19separate sheet of each petition specified in sub. (1), stating that he or she and shall 20state all of the following:SB1180,6,22212. That the circulator personally circulated the petition and personally 22obtained each of the signatures; that the circulator knows that they.SB1180,7,213. That, to the best of the circulator’s knowledge, the signers are electors of 2the jurisdiction or district in which the petition is circulated; that.SB1180,7,434. That the circulator knows that they the signers signed the paper with full 4knowledge of its content; that the circulator knows their respective.SB1180,7,655. That, to the best of the circulator’s knowledge, the residences given; that by 6the signers are actual residences.SB1180,7,876. That the circulator knows that each signer signed on the date stated 8opposite his or her name; that.SB1180,7,1297. That the circulator is a qualified elector of this state, or if not a qualified 10elector of this state, that the circulator is a U.S. citizen age 18 or older who, if he or 11she were a resident of this state, would not be disqualified from voting under s. 6.03; 12and that.SB1180,7,14138. That the circulator is aware that falsifying the certification is punishable 14under s. 12.13 (3) (a).SB1180,7,1615(b) The circulator certification under par. (a) shall indicate the date that he or 16she the circulator makes the certification next to his or her signature.SB1180,1217Section 12. 8.40 (2) (a) 1. of the statutes is created to read:SB1180,7,18188.40 (2) (a) 1. The circulator’s residence with street and number, if any.SB1180,7,1919